Washington statutes.
RCW 43.386.040

Testing—When required.

Prior to deploying a facial recognition service in the context in which it will be used, a state or local government agency using a facial recognition service to make decisions that produce legal effects on individuals or similarly significant effects on individuals must test the facial recognition service in operational conditions. An agency must take reasonable steps to ensure best quality results by following all guidance provided by the developer of the facial recognition service.

[ 2020 c 257 s 5.]